California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
No addition to tax shall be made under Section 19136 for any installment of tax due on or after January 1, 1993, to the extent that the underpayment is attributable solely to changes made to the laws of other states applicable to the determination of credits that make Section 18001 inapplicable, by its terms, to a resident of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 28.1.   Effective October 6, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 102 of Ch. 877.)
-------------------------------------------

19136.7.

(a) No additions to tax shall be made under Section 19136 or 19142 with respect to any underpayment of an installment for a taxable year, to the extent that the underpayment was created or increased as the direct result of an erroneous levy, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action by the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board shall implement this section in a reasonable manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 349, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19136.12.

(a) No addition to tax shall be made pursuant to Section 19136 for any period before the date prescribed under Section 18566 for the filing of the return for the 2005 taxable year, with respect to any underpayment of an installment for the 2005 taxable year, to the extent that the underpayment was created or increased by any provision of the act adding this section.

(b) No addition to tax shall be made pursuant to Section 18601 for the filing of the return for the 2005
 taxable year, with respect to any underpayment of an installment for the 2005 taxable year, to the extent that the underpayment was created or increased by any provision of the act adding this section.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board shall implement this section in a reasonable manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 47.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19136.13.

No addition to tax shall be made pursuant to Section 19136 for any period before the date prescribed under Section 18566 for the filing of the return for the 2007 taxable year, with respect to any underpayment of an installment for the 2007 taxable year, to the extent that the underpayment was created or increased by any provision of the act adding this section or Chapter 802 of the Statutes of 2006.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 426, Sec. 3.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19138.

(a) (1) A taxpayer subject to the tax imposed under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) with an understatement of tax for any taxable year shall be subject to the penalty imposed under this section if that understatement exceeds the greater of the following:

(A) One million dollars ($1,000,000).

(B) Twenty percent of the tax shown on an original return or shown on an amended return filed on or before the original or extended due date of the return for the taxable year.

(2) For taxpayers that are required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, the threshold amount prescribed in subparagraph (A) or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) shall apply to the aggregate amount of tax liability under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) for all taxpayers that are required to be or authorized to be included in a combined report.

(b) (1) The penalty under this section shall be an amount equal to 20 percent of any understatement of tax. For purposes of this section, “understatement of tax” means the amount by
 which the tax imposed by Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) exceeds the amount of tax shown on an original return or shown on an amended return filed on or before the original or extended due date of the return for the taxable year.

(2) For any taxable year beginning before January 1, 2008, the amount of tax paid on or before May 31, 2009, and shown on an amended return filed on or before May 31, 2009, shall be treated as the amount of tax shown on an original return for purposes of this section.

(3) The amount of additional tax shown on the first amended return reflecting a proper election under Section 338 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain stock purchases treated as asset acquisitions, shall be treated as if that amount was included in the amount of tax shown on an original return for purposes of this section.

(c) The penalty imposed by this section shall be in addition to any other penalty imposed under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) or this part.

(d) Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031), relating to deficiency assessments, shall not apply with respect to the assessment or collection of any penalty imposed by subdivision (a).

(e) A refund or credit for any amounts paid to satisfy a penalty imposed under this section may be allowed only on the grounds that the amount of the penalty was not properly computed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(f) No penalty shall be imposed under this section on any understatement to the extent that the understatement is attributable to any of the following:

(1) (A) A change in law that is enacted, promulgated, issued, or becomes final after the earlier of either of the following dates: 

(i) The date the taxpayer files the return for the taxable year for which the change is operative.

(ii) The extended due date for the return of the taxpayer for the taxable year for which the change is operative.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, a “change of law” means a statutory change or an interpretation of law or rule of law by regulation, legal ruling of counsel, within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 11340.9 of the Government Code, or a published federal or California court decision.

(C) The Franchise Tax Board shall implement this paragraph in a reasonable manner.

(2) The imposition of an alternative apportionment or allocation method by the Franchise Tax Board under the authority of Section 25137 because the standard allocation and apportionment provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 25120) and the regulations thereunder do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer’s business activity in this state.

(3) A change to the taxpayer’s federal accounting method pursuant to Section 446 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to general rule for methods of accounting, that is applicable for purposes of Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), but only to the extent of understatements for taxable years where the due date of the return, without regard to any extension of time for filing the return, is before the date of consent of the secretary to that change of accounting method.

(g) No penalty shall be imposed under this section to the extent that a taxpayer’s understatement is attributable to the taxpayer’s reasonable reliance on written advice of the Franchise Tax Board, but only if the written advice was a legal ruling by the Chief Counsel, within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 21012.

(h) (1) This section shall apply to each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2003, for which the statute of limitations on assessment has not expired.

(2) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 721 of the Statutes of 2010 shall apply to each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2010.

(3) (A) Except as otherwise provided, the amendments made to this
 section by the act adding this paragraph shall apply to each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2015.

(B) The provisions of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), as added by the act adding this paragraph, shall apply to understatements for any taxable year for which the statute of limitations on assessments has not expired as of the effective date of the act adding this paragraph.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 359, Sec. 20.   (AB 154)   Effective September 30, 2015.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

19141.

Upon certification by the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2204 or subdivision (a) of Section 17713.09 of the Corporations Code, the Franchise Tax Board shall assess a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250). Upon certification by the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 6810 or subdivision (a) of Section 8810 of the Corporations Code, the Franchise Tax Board shall assess a
 penalty of fifty dollars ($50). Any penalty assessed under this section shall be a final assessment due and payable at the time of assessment but no interest shall accrue thereon. The assessment shall be collected as other taxes, interest, and penalties are collected by the Franchise Tax Board unless the Secretary of State decertifies the name of the corporation as provided in subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 2204, subdivision (e) of Section 6810, subdivision (e) of Section 8810, or subdivision (e) of Section 17713.08, of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 28.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

19141.2.

(a) Section 6038 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to information with respect to certain foreign corporations, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 6038(a) is modified as follows:

(1) The information required to be filed with the Franchise Tax Board under this section shall be a copy of the information required to be filed with the Internal Revenue Service.

(2) The term “United States person,” as defined in Section 7701(a)(30) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be limited to a domestic corporation, as defined in Section 7701(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, or a bank, as defined in Section 23039, that is subject to the tax imposed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101), Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 23400), or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501), of Part 11.

(c) (1) Unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause and not due to willful neglect, a penalty shall be imposed under this part for failure to furnish information and that penalty shall be determined in accordance with Section 6038 of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided.

(A) Section 6038(b) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified
 by substituting “$1,000” for “$10,000” in each place it appears.

(B) Section 6038(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified by substituting “$24,000” for “$50,000.”

(2) No penalty shall be imposed under paragraph (1) if the copy of the information required to be filed with the Internal Revenue Service was not attached to the taxpayer’s return as originally filed but the taxpayer does both of the following:

(A) Furnishes the copy of the information required to be filed with the Internal Revenue Service either upon its own initiative or within 90 days of notification by the Franchise Tax Board of the requirements of this section.

(B) Agrees to attach a copy of the information required to be filed with the Internal Revenue Service to the
 taxpayer’s original return filed for subsequent taxable years.

(3) All or any portion of the penalty imposed under paragraph (1) may be waived by the Franchise Tax Board when the taxpayer has entered into a voluntary disclosure agreement under Article 8 (commencing with Section 19191) of Chapter 4.

(4) The penalty imposed under this subdivision shall not apply to returns required to be filed for taxable years beginning before January 1, 1998.

(d) This section shall apply to returns required to be filed for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19141.5.

(a) (1) Section 6038A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to information with respect to certain foreign-owned corporations, shall apply.

(2) A penalty shall be imposed under this part for failure to furnish information or maintain records and that penalty shall be determined in accordance with Section 6038A of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided.

(3) The penalty amounts in Section 6038A(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to penalty for failure to furnish information or maintain records, are modified by substituting “$10,000” in lieu of “$25,000.”

(4) Section 6038A(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to enforcement of requests for certain records, is modified as follows:

(A) Each reference to Section 7602, 7603, or 7604 of the Internal Revenue Code shall instead refer to Section 19504.

(B) Each reference to “summons” shall instead refer to “subpoena duces tecum.”

(C) Section 6038A(e)(4)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall refer to “superior courts of the State of California for the Counties of Los Angeles, Sacramento, and San Diego, and for the City and County of San Francisco,” instead of “United States district court for the district in which the person (to whom the summons is issued) resides or
 is found.”

(b) In the case of a corporation, each of the following shall apply:

(1) Section 6038B of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to notice of certain transfers to foreign persons, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) The information required to be filed with the Franchise Tax Board under this subdivision shall be a copy of the information required to be filed with the Internal Revenue Service.

(3) (A) A penalty shall be imposed under this part for failure to furnish information and that penalty shall be determined in accordance with Section 6038B of the Internal Revenue Code,
 except as otherwise provided.

(B) Subparagraph (A) shall not apply to any transfer described in Section 6038B(a)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) (1) Section 6038C of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to information with respect to foreign corporations engaged in United States business, shall apply.

(2) A penalty shall be imposed under this part for failure to furnish information or maintain records and that penalty shall be determined in accordance with Section 6038C of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) Section 6038C(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to enforcement of requests for certain records, is modified
 as follows:

(A) Each reference to Section 7602, 7603, or 7604 of the Internal Revenue Code shall instead refer to Section 19504.

(B) Each reference to “summons” shall instead refer to “subpoena duces tecum.”

(d) (1) Section 6038D of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to information with respect to foreign financial assets, shall apply.

(2) A penalty shall be imposed under this part for failure to furnish information and that penalty shall be determined in accordance with Section 6038D of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) For purposes of this part, the information required to be filed with
 the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section shall be a copy of the information filed with the Internal Revenue Service.

(f) For purposes of this section, each of the following shall apply:

(1) Section 7701(a)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the term “domestic,” shall apply.

(2) Section 7701(a)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the term “foreign,” shall apply.

(3) Section 7701(a)(30) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the term “United States person,” shall apply. However, the term “United States person” shall not include any corporation that is not subject to the tax imposed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101),
 Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 23400), or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501), of Part 11.

(g) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 68.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016, as provided in subdivision (g).)
-------------------------------------------

19141.6.

(a) Each taxpayer determining its income subject to tax pursuant to Section 25101 or electing to file pursuant to Section 25110 shall, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1994, maintain (in the location, in the manner, and to the extent prescribed in regulations promulgated by the Franchise Tax Board on or before December 31, 1995) and make available upon request all of the following:

(1) Any records as may be appropriate to determine the correct treatment
 of the components that are a part of one or more unitary businesses for purposes of determining the income derived from or attributable to this state pursuant to Section 25101 or 25110.

(2) Any records as may be appropriate to determine the correct treatment of amounts that are attributable to the classification of an item as business or nonbusiness income for purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 25120) of Chapter 17 of Part 11.

(3) Any records as may be appropriate to determine the correct treatment of the apportionment factors for purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 25120) of Chapter 17 of Part 11.

(4) Documents and information, including any questionnaires completed and submitted to the Internal Revenue Service, that are necessary to audit issues involving attribution of income to the United
 States or foreign jurisdictions under Section 882 of, or Subpart F of Part III of Subchapter N of, or similar provisions of, the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) Information for any year shall be retained for that period of time in which the taxpayers’ income or franchise tax liability to this state may be subject to adjustment, including all periods in which additional income or franchise taxes may be assessed, not to exceed eight years from the due date or extended due date of the return, or during which a protest is pending before the Franchise Tax Board, or an appeal is pending before the State Board of Equalization, or a lawsuit is pending in the courts of this state or the United States with respect to California franchise or income tax.

(2) “Related party” means corporations that
 are related because one owns or controls, directly or indirectly, more than 50 percent of the stock of the other or because more than 50 percent of the voting stock of each is owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by the same interests.

(3) “Records” includes any books, papers, or other data.

(c) (1) If a corporation subject to this section fails to maintain or fails to cause another to maintain records as required by subdivision (a), that corporation shall pay a penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each taxable year with respect to which the failure occurs.

(2) If any failure described in paragraph (1) continues for more than 90 days after the day on which the Franchise Tax Board mails notice of the failure to the corporation, that corporation shall pay a penalty (in addition to
 the amount required under paragraph (1)) of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each 30-day period (or fraction thereof) during which the failure continues after the expiration of the 90-day period. The additional penalty imposed by this subdivision shall not exceed a maximum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) if the failure to maintain or the failure to cause another to maintain is not willful. This maximum shall apply with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1994, and before the earlier of the first day of the month following the month in which regulations are adopted pursuant to this section or December 31, 1995.

(3) For purposes of this section, the time prescribed by regulations to maintain records (and the beginning of the 90-day period after notice by the Franchise Tax Board) shall be treated as not earlier than the last day on which (as shown to the satisfaction of the Franchise Tax Board) reasonable cause existed
 for failure to maintain the records.

(d) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may apply the rules of paragraph (2) whether or not the board begins a proceeding to enforce a subpoena, or subpoena duces tecum, if subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) apply:

(A) For purposes of determining the correct treatment under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of the items described in subdivision (a), the Franchise Tax Board issues a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum to a corporation to produce (either directly or as agent for the related party) any records or testimony.

(B) The subpoena or subpoena duces tecum is not quashed in a proceeding begun under paragraph (3) and is not determined to be invalid in a proceeding begun under Section 19504 to enforce the subpoena or subpoena duces tecum.

(C) The corporation does not substantially comply in a timely manner with the subpoena or subpoena duces tecum and the Franchise Tax Board has sent by certified or registered mail a notice to that corporation that it has not substantially complied.

(D) If the corporation fails to maintain or fails to cause another to maintain records as required by subdivision (a), and by reason of that failure, the subpoena, or subpoena duces tecum, is quashed in a proceeding described in subparagraph (B) or the corporation is not able to provide the records requested in the subpoena or subpoena duces tecum, the Franchise Tax Board may apply the rules of paragraph (2) to any of the items described in subdivision (a) to which the records relate.

(2) (A) All of the following shall be determined by the Franchise Tax
 Board in the Franchise Tax Board’s sole discretion from the Franchise Tax Board’s own knowledge or from information the Franchise Tax Board may obtain through testimony or otherwise:

(i) The components that are a part of one or more unitary businesses for purposes of determining the income derived from or attributable to this state pursuant to Section 25101 or 25110.

(ii) Amounts that are attributable to the classification of an item as business or nonbusiness income for purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 25120) of Chapter 17 of Part 11.

(iii) The apportionment factors for purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 25120) of Chapter 17 of Part 11.

(iv) The correct amount of income under Section 882 of, or Subpart F of Part III of
 Subchapter N of, or similar provisions of, the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) This paragraph shall apply to determine the correct treatment of the items described in subdivision (a) unless the corporation is authorized by its related parties (in the manner and at the time as the Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe) to act as the related parties’ limited agent solely for purposes of applying Section 19504 with respect to any request by the Franchise Tax Board to examine records or produce testimony related to any item described in subdivision (a) or with respect to any subpoena or subpoena duces tecum for the records or testimony. The appearance of persons or the production of records by reason of the corporation being an agent shall not subject those persons or records to legal process for any purpose other than determining the correct treatment under Part 11 of the items described in subdivision (a).

(C) Determinations made in the sole discretion of the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this paragraph may be appealed to the State Board of Equalization, in the manner and at the time prescribed by Section 19045 or 19324, or may be the subject of an action to recover tax, in the manner and at a time prescribed by Section 19382. The review of determinations by the board or the court shall be limited to whether the determinations were arbitrary or capricious, or are not supported by substantial evidence.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding any other law or rule of law, any reporting corporation to which the Franchise Tax Board issues a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum referred to in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall have the right to begin a proceeding to quash the subpoena or subpoena duces tecum not later than the 90th day after the subpoena or subpoena duces tecum was
 issued. In that proceeding, the Franchise Tax Board may seek to compel compliance with the subpoena or subpoena duces tecum.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law or rule of law, any reporting corporation that has been notified by the Franchise Tax Board that it has determined that the corporation has not substantially complied with a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum referred to in paragraph (1) shall have the right to begin a proceeding to review the determination not later than the 90th day after the day on which the notice referred to in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) was mailed. If the proceeding is not begun on or before the 90th day, the determination by the Franchise Tax Board shall be binding and shall not be reviewed by any court.

(C) The superior courts of the State of California for the Counties of Los Angeles, Sacramento, and San Diego, and for the City and County of
 San Francisco, shall have jurisdiction to hear any proceeding brought under subparagraphs (A) and (B). Any order or other determination in the proceeding shall be treated as a final order that may be appealed.

(D) If any corporation takes any action as provided in subparagraphs (A) and (B), the running of any period of limitations under Sections 19057 to 19064, inclusive (relating to the assessment and collection of tax), or under Section 19704 (relating to criminal prosecutions) with respect to that corporation shall be suspended for the period during which the proceedings, and appeals therein, are pending. In no event shall any period expire before the 90th day after the day on which there is a final determination in the proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19142.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 19147 and 19148 and subdivision (b), in the case of any underpayment of tax imposed under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) there shall be added to the tax for the taxable year an amount determined at the rate established under Section 19521 on the amount of the underpayment for the period of the underpayment.

(b) (1) No addition to tax shall be imposed under this section to the extent that the underpayment was
 created or increased by any provision of law that is chaptered during and operative for the taxable year of the underpayment.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 18415, this subdivision applies to penalties imposed on and after January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 242, Sec. 8.   Effective September 22, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19144.

(a) For the purposes of Section 19142, the amount of the underpayment shall be the excess of the amount calculated in paragraph (1) over the amount calculated in paragraph (2).

(1) (A) The amount of the installment that would be required to be paid if the estimated tax were equal to the applicable percentage of the tax shown on the return for the taxable
 year.

(B) If no return was filed, the applicable percentage of the tax for that year.

(2) The amount, if any, of the installment paid on or before the last date prescribed for payment.

(b) For purposes of this section, the “applicable percentage” shall be as follows:

(1) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 1998, 95 percent.

(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998, 100 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 69.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19145.

For purposes of Section 19142, the period of the underpayment shall run from the date the installment was required to be made to whichever of the following dates is the earlier:

(a) The 15th day of the third month following the close of the taxable year, except in the case of an organization described in Section 23731 subject to the tax imposed under Section 23731, in which case “fifth” shall be substituted for “third.”

(b) With
 respect to any portion of the underpayment, the date on which that portion is paid. For purposes of this subdivision, a payment of estimated tax on any installment date shall be considered a payment of any previous underpayment only to the extent the payment exceeds the amount of the installment determined under subdivision (a) of Section 19144 for the installment date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19147.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 19142 to 19145, inclusive, the addition to the tax with respect to any underpayment of any installment shall not be imposed if the total amount of all payments of estimated tax paid on or before the last date prescribed for the payment of the installment equals or exceeds the amount which would have been required to be paid on or before that date if the estimated tax were whichever of the following is the lesser:

(1) (A) The tax shown on the return of the taxpayer for the preceding taxable year if a return showing a liability for tax was filed by the taxpayer for the preceding year and that preceding year was a year of 12 months. The tax shown on the return, in the case of the tax imposed by Article 3 (commencing with Section 23181) of Chapter 2 of Part 11, means the amount of tax shown on the return for the taxable year as prescribed in Section 19021.

(B) In the case of a large corporation, subparagraph (A) shall not apply, except as provided in clauses (i) and (ii).

(i) Subparagraph (A) shall apply for purposes of determining the amount of the first required installment for any taxable year.

(ii) Any reduction in the first required installment by reason of clause (i) shall be recaptured by increasing the amount of
 the next required installment by the amount of that reduction.

(2) (A) An amount equal to the applicable percentage specified in Section 19144 of the tax for the taxable year computed by placing on an annualized basis the taxable income:

(i) For the first three months of the taxable year, in the case of the installment required to be paid in the fourth month.

(ii) For the first three months of the taxable year, in the case of the installment required to be paid in the sixth month.

(iii) For the first six months of the taxable year, in the case of the installment required to be paid in the ninth month.

(iv) For the first nine months of the taxable year, in the case of
 the installment required to be paid in the 12th month of the taxable year.

(B) (i) If the taxpayer makes an election under this clause, each of the following shall apply:

(I) Clause (i) of subparagraph (A) shall be applied by substituting “two months” for “three months.”

(II) Clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) shall be applied by substituting “four months” for “three months.”

(III) Clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) shall be applied by substituting “seven months” for “six months.”

(IV) Clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) shall be applied by substituting “ten months” for “nine months.”

(ii) If the taxpayer makes
 an election under this clause, each of the following shall apply:

(I) Clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) shall be applied by substituting “five months” for “three months.”

(II) Clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) shall be applied by substituting “eight months” for “six months.”

(III) Clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) shall be applied by substituting “eleven months” for “nine months.”

(iii) An election under clause (i) or (ii) shall apply to the taxable year for which the election is made and shall be effective only if the election is made on or before the date required for the payment of the first required installment for that taxable year.

(iv) This subparagraph shall apply to taxable years
 beginning on or after January 1, 1997.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, the taxable income shall be placed on an annualized basis in the following manner:

(i) Multiply by 12 the taxable income referred to in subparagraph (A).

(ii) Divide the resulting amount by the number of months in the taxable year referred to in subparagraph (A).

“Taxable income” as used in this paragraph means “net income” includable in the measure of tax or “alternative minimum taxable income” (as defined by Section 23455).

(D) In the case of any corporation which is subject to the tax imposed under Section 23731, any reference to taxable income shall be treated as including a reference to unrelated business taxable income and, except
 in the case of an election under subparagraph (B), each of the following shall apply:

(i) Clause (i) of subparagraph (A) shall be applied by substituting “two months” for “three months.”

(ii) Clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) shall be applied by substituting “four months” for “three months.”

(iii) Clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) shall be applied by substituting “seven months” for “six months.”

(iv) Clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) shall be applied by substituting “ten months” for “nine months.”

(3) The applicable percentage specified in Section 19144 or more of the tax for the taxable year was paid by withholding of tax pursuant to Section 18662.

(4) The applicable percentage specified in Section 19144 or more of the net income for the taxable year consists of items from which an amount was withheld pursuant to Section 18662, the amount of the first installment under Section 19025 equals at least the minimum franchise tax specified in Section 23153, and the amount of any installment under Section 19025 includes an amount equal to the applicable tax under Section 23800.5.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “large corporation” means any corporation if that corporation (or any predecessor corporation) had taxable income (computed without regard to net operating loss deductions) of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more for any taxable year during the testing period.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “testing period” means the three
 taxable years immediately preceding the taxable year involved.

(c) (1) Any dividend received from a closely held real estate investment trust by any person that owns (after application of Sections 856(d)(5) and 856(l)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code) 10 percent or more (by vote or value) of the stock or beneficial interests in the trust shall be taken into account in computing annualized income installments under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) in a manner similar to the manner under which partnership income inclusions are taken into account.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the term “closely held real estate investment trust” means a real estate investment trust with respect to which five or fewer persons own (after application of Sections 856(d)(5) and 856(l)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code) 50 percent or more (by vote or value) of
 the stock or beneficial interests in the trust.

(3) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to estimated tax payments due on or after January 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   Effective March 29, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19148.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 19142 to 19147, inclusive, the addition to the tax with respect to any underpayment of any installment shall not be imposed if the total amount of all payments of estimated tax made on or before the last date prescribed for the payment of that installment equals or exceeds the applicable percentage specified in Section 19144 of the amount determined under subdivision (b).

(b) The amount determined under this subdivision for any installment
 shall be determined in the following manner:

(1) Take the net income for all months during the taxable year preceding the filing month.

(2) Divide that amount by the base period percentage for all months during the taxable year preceding the filing month.

(3) Determine the tax on the amount determined under paragraph (2).

(4) Multiply the tax computed under paragraph (3) by the base period percentage for the filing months and all months during the taxable year preceding the filing month.

(c) For purposes of this subdivision:

(1) The base period percentage for any period of months shall be the average percent which the net
 income for the corresponding months in each of the three preceding taxable years bears to the net income for the three preceding taxable years.

(2) “Filing month” means the month in which the installment is required to be paid.

(3) This subdivision shall only apply if the base period percentage for any six consecutive months of the taxable year equals or exceeds 70 percent.

(4) The Franchise Tax Board may by regulations provide for the determination of the base period percentage in the case of reorganizations, new corporations, and other similar circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19149.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of Sections 19142 to 19151, inclusive, if the amount of estimated tax due and payable under Section 19025 is only the minimum franchise tax imposed by Section 23153 and, if applicable, the tax of a wholly owned subsidiary under Section 23800.5, then the addition to the tax with respect to any underpayment of any installment imposed by Section 19142 shall be calculated only on the basis of the amount of the minimum franchise tax and the amount of the tax of each wholly owned subsidiary.

(b) This section shall not apply to a large corporation as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 19147.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 7, Sec. 22.   Effective March 14, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19150.

The application of Sections 19142 to 19151, inclusive, to taxable years of less than 12 months shall be in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19151.

Notwithstanding Sections 19142 to 19150, inclusive, the addition to the tax with respect to underpayment of any installment shall not be imposed on an exempt organization described in Section 23731 whose exemption is retroactively revoked unless the organization described in Section 23731 has notice that the estimated tax should have been paid. The denial of the organization’s exemption application or the revocation of its exemption by the Internal Revenue Service normally satisfies the notice requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 75.3.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19161.

(a) An addition to tax shall not be made under Section 19132, 19136, or 19142 for failure to make timely payment of tax with respect to a period during which a case is pending under Title 11 of the United States Code in either of the following situations:

(1) If that tax was incurred by the estate and the failure occurred pursuant to an
 order of the court finding probable insufficiency of funds of the estate to pay administrative expenses.

(2) If:

(A) That tax was incurred by the debtor before the earlier of the order for relief or (in the involuntary case) the appointment of a trustee, and

(B) (i) The petition was filed before the due date prescribed by law (including extensions) for filing a return of that tax, or

(ii) The date for making the addition to the tax occurs on or after the day on which the petition was filed.
